morphobasque.xfst
#######################
#
# A simple morphological analyzer for Basque
#
#
#######################

define NOUN [ e u s k a r a | e r a s o | m u g a | e r a n t z u n | g a r a i | m o b i l i z a z i o | k o n t s e i l u | o t s a i l a | D a t a | h e r r i | e s k u | g o g o | e r a n t z u k i z u n | B i l e r a | e r r o n d a | a l d e r d i | o r d e z k a r i | e r a g i l e | k o n p r o m i s o | o p a r i | i r a k u r k e t a | z u z e n d a r i t z a | t a l d e | a g e r r a l d i | o r d u | A l d u n d i | D o n o s t i a | e s t a t u | C a r l o s | U r k i j o | b i d e | P a t r i c k | D a l l e n n e s | e g o e r a | n e u r r i | i d a z k a r i | P a u l | B i l b a o | u d a l | b a b e s | a l b i s t e | i k u r | i n f o r m a z i o | i n g u r u | a u z i t a r a | U E M A | G i p u z k o a | F o r u | U z t a r i t z e | b a l i o | h e l b u r u | a p u s t u a | d e t e r m i n a z i o | i n s t i t u z i o | E u s k a r a | K o n t s e i l u | h e r r i t a r | b i l e r a | E s t a t u | U r q u i j o | U d a l | d a t a | I k u r | I n f o r m a z i o | d o n o s t i a | c a r l o s | u r q u i j o | p a t r i c k | d a l l e n n e s | p a u l  | b i l b a o | u e m a | g i p u z k o a | f o r u | a l d u n d i a | u z t a r i t z ] %+NOUN:0;

define DETERMINER [ g u z t i | b a t | h a u | h o r i | h u r a | h a u e k | h o r i e k | h a i e k ] %+DET:0;

define ADJECTIVE [ i n s t i t u z i o n a l | h a r p i d e d u n | e s p a i n o l | f r a n t s e s | n a g u s i | a z k e n | j u r i d i k o ] %+ADJ:0;

define PRONOUN [ G u | z u | n i | z u e k | h a i e k | b e r a | h o n e n | g u r e a | g u ] %+PRON:0;

define SUFFIX [ r e n | e k | a k | a | k | e i | e k i n | z | r i | e n | k o | n | a r i ];

define ADVERB [ a u r k a | e z i n | p r e s t | g a u r | g o i z | a u r r e | e z | s o i l i k | b a i | a z k e n | h e m e n | e r e | a u r r e a n | d o a n | e g u n e r o | g e h i a g o | o s o ] %+ADVB:0;

define VERB [ g a i n d i t u | e m a n | i r i t z i | a n t o l a t u | g o r d e t u | e s k a t u | u t z i | p a r t e k a t u | o h a r t a r a z i | e g i n | n a b a r m e n d u | h a r t u | i k u s i | e r r a n | o r d a i n d u | b a t e r a t u | a u r k e z t u | e r a m a n | a g e r t u | b i z i | n a h i | i z a n | e r a k u t s i | k e n d u | e u t s i | z i u r t a t u | i r a k u r r i | e r r e g i s t r a t u ];

define POSTPOS [ b e h a r | b e h a r r e k o a k | b e h a r r e k o | g i s a ] %+POSTPOS:0;

#define VERBFIX [ l a | t e k o | t a | k o | e n | z e k o | n | d a k o | g o | e l a | t z e k o ];

define CONJ [ e t a | b a i n a | B a i n a ] %+CONJ:0;

define NUMERAL [ 2 8 | l e h e n a k | b i g a r r e n a k | h a m a b o s t | d e n a | 2 8 a ] %+NUM:0;

define ADVBCLAUSE [ 2 8 r a k o ] %+ADVBCLAUSE:0;

define RELATIVE [ z e ] %+REL:0;

define CONJUNCT [ h o r r e k i n | H o r r e k i n | b a t e r a ] %+CONJUNCT:0;

define PUNCT [ "." | "," | ":" ] %+PUNC:0;


#--------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> rules for verbs

define VERBPOS %+VB:0;

define FUTUREMARK [0 | %+VBF:{ko} ];

define FINALCASE [{iritsi}:{iristeko} | {eman}:{emateko} | {gainditu}:{gainditzeko} | {iritzi}:{irizteko} | {antolatu}:{antolatzeko} | {gordetu}:{gordetzeko} | {eskatu}:{eskatzeko} | {utzi}:{uzteko} | {partekatu}:{partekatzeko} | {ohartarazi}:{ohartarazteko} | {egin}:{egiteko} | {nabarmendu}:{nabarmentzeko} | {hartu}:{hartzeko} | {ikusi}:{ikusteko} | {erran}:{erratzeko} | {ordaindu}:{ordaintzeko} | {bateratu}:{bateratzeko} | {aurkeztu}:{aurkezteko} | {eraman}:{eramateko} | {agertu}:{agertzeko} | {bizi}:{bizitzeko} | {izan}:{izateko} | {erakutsi}:{erakusteko} | {kendu}:{kentzeko} | {eutsi}:{eusteko} | {ziurtatu}:{ziurtatzeko} | {irakurri}:{irakurtzeko} | {erregistratu}:{erregistratzeko} | {esan}:{esateko} ] %+VB:0 %+FIN:0;

define DIALECTALFINALCASE [{iritsi}:{iritsiten} | {eman}:{emanen} | {gainditu}:{gaindituten} | {iritzi}:{iritziten} | {antolatu}:{antolatuten} | {gordetu}:{gordetuten} | {eskatu}:{eskatuten} | {utzi}:{utziten} | {partekatu}:{partekatuten} | {ohartarazi}:{ohartaraziten} | {egin}:{eginen} | {nabarmendu}:{nabarmenduten} | {hartu}:{hartuten} | {ikusi}:{ikusiten} | {erran}:{erranen} | {ordaindu}:{ordainduten} | {bateratu}:{bateratuten} | {aurkeztu}:{aurkeztuten} | {eraman}:{eramanen} | {agertu}:{agertuten} | {bizi}:{biziten} | {izan}:{izanen} | {erakutsi}:{erakutsiten} | {kendu}:{kenduten} | {eutsi}:{eutsiten} | {ziurtatu}:{ziurtatuten} | {irakurri}:{irakurriten} | {erregistratu}:{erregistratuten} | {esan}:{esanen} ] %+VB:0 %+FIN:0;

define GERUND [{iritsi}:{iristen} | {eman}:{ematen} | {gainditu}:{gainditzen} | {iritzi}:{irizten} | {antolatu}:{antolatzen} | {gordetu}:{gordetzen} | {eskatu}:{eskatzen} | {utzi}:{uzten} | {partekatu}:{partekatzen} | {ohartarazi}:{ohartarazten} | {egin}:{egiten} | {nabarmendu}:{nabarmentzen} | {hartu}:{hartzen} | {ikusi}:{ikusten} | {erran}:{erratzen} | {ordaindu}:{ordaintzen} | {bateratu}:{bateratzen} | {aurkeztu}:{aurkezten} | {eraman}:{eramaten} | {agertu}:{agertzen} | {bizi}:{bizitzen} | {izan}:{izaten} | {erakutsi}:{erakusten} | {kendu}:{kentzen} | {eutsi}:{eusten} | {ziurtatu}:{ziurtatzen} | {irakurri}:{irakurtzen} | {erregistratu}:{erregistratzen} | {esan}:{esaten} ] %+VB:0 %+GER:0;

define ADJECTIVALPARTICIPLE [{iritsi}:{iritsita} | {eman}:{emanda} | {gainditu}:{gaindituta} | {iritzi}:{iritzita} | {antolatu}:{antolatuta} | {gordetu}:{gordeta} | {eskatu}:{eskatuta} | {utzi}:{utzita} | {partekatu}:{partekatua} | {ohartarazi}:{ohartaraztuta} | {egin}:{eginda} | {nabarmendu}:{nabarmenduta} | {hartu}:{hartuta} | {ikusi}:{ikusita} | {erran}:{erranda} | {ordaindu}:{ordainduta} | {bateratu}:{bateratua} | {aurkeztu}:{aurkeztuta} | {eraman}:{eramanda} | {agertu}:{agertuta} | {bizi}:{bizita} | {izan}:{izanda} | {erakutsi}:{erakutsita} | {kendu}:{kenduta} | {eutsi}:{eutsita} | {ziurtatu}:{ziurtatuta} | {irakurri}:{irakurrita} | {erregistratu}:{erregistratuta} | {esan}:{esanda} ] %+VB:0 %+ADJPP:0;

define ADJECTIVALRELATIVE [{iritsi}:{iritsitako} | {eman}:{emandako} | {gainditu}:{gainditutako} | {iritzi}:{iritzitako} | {antolatu}:{antolatutako} | {gordetu}:{gordetako} | {eskatu}:{eskatutako} | {utzi}:{utzitako} | {partekatu}:{partekatutako} | {ohartarazi}:{ohartaraztutako} | {egin}:{egindako} | {nabarmendu}:{nabarmendutako} | {hartu}:{hartutako} | {ikusi}:{ikusitako} | {erran}:{errandako} | {ordaindu}:{ordaindutako} | {bateratu}:{bateratutako} | {aurkeztu}:{aurkeztutako} | {eraman}:{eramandako} | {agertu}:{agertutako} | {bizi}:{bizitako} | {izan}:{izandako} | {erakutsi}:{erakutsitako} | {kendu}:{kendutako} | {eutsi}:{eutsitako} | {ziurtatu}:{ziurtatutako} | {irakurri}:{irakurritako} | {erregistratu}:{erregistratutako} | {esan}:{esandako} ] %+VB:0 %+ADJREL:0;

define FUTURERULE1 k -> g || ?* n _ o .#.;

define VERBCAT VERB VERBPOS FUTUREMARK;

#------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> rules for auxiliar verbs, which play a fundamental role in the sentence understanding of Basque

define BEHARREKOAK [{behar}:{beharrekoak}] %+VB:0 %+NOMINALIZATION:0;

define AUXVERB1 [{edun}:{du}] %+AUX:0 %+3PSGSUBJECT%-3PSGOBJECT:0;

define AUXVERB2 [{edun}:{dituzte}] %+AUX:0 %+3PPLSUBJECT%-3PPLOBJECT:0;

define AUXVERB3 [{edin}:{die}] %+AUX:0 %+3PSGSUBJECT%-3PSGOBJECT%-3PPLINDIRECT:0;

define AUXVERB4 [{egon}:{daude}] %+AUX:0 %+3PPL:0;

define AUXVERB5 [{egon}:{dago}] %+AUX:0 %+3PSG:0;

define AUXVERB6 [{edun}:{dute}] %+AUX:0 %+3PPLSUBJECT%-3PSGOBJECT:0;

define AUXVERB7 [{edin}:{diote}] %+AUX:0 %+3PPLSUBJECT%-%3PSGOBJECT%-3PSGINDIRECT:0;

define AUXVERB8 [{edun}:{dugu}] %+AUX:0 %+1PPLSUBJECT%-3PSGOBJECT:0;

define AUXVERB9 [{edun}:{duzu}] %+AUX:0 %+2PSGSUBJECT%-3PSGOBJECT:0;

define AUXVERB10 [{egon}:{bazara}] %+AUX:0 %+2PSGSUBJECT:0 %+CONDITIONAL:0;

define AUXVERB11 [{izan}:{dela}] %+AUX:0 %+3PSGSUBJECT:0 %+RELATIVECLAUSE:0;

define AUXVERB12 [{izan}:{dira}] %+AUX:0 %+3PPLSUBJECT:0;

define RELATIVECLAUSEMARK [ 0 | %+REL:{ela} ];

define NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE [ 0 | %+RELNOM:{en} ];

define RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 e -> 0 || ?* e _ l a .#.;

define NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1 e -> 0 || ?* e _ n .#.;

define AUXILIARVERB1 AUXVERB1 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB2 AUXVERB2 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB3 AUXVERB3 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB4 AUXVERB4 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB5 AUXVERB5 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB6 AUXVERB6 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB7 AUXVERB7 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB8 AUXVERB8 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB9 AUXVERB9 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

define AUXILIARVERB10 AUXVERB10 RELATIVECLAUSEMARK NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSE;

read regex VERBCAT .o. FUTURERULE1;

read regex FINALCASE;

read regex DIALECTALFINALCASE;

read regex GERUND;

read regex ADJECTIVALPARTICIPLE;

read regex ADJECTIVALRELATIVE;

read regex BEHARREKOAK;

read regex AUXILIARVERB1 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB2 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB3 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB4 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB5 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB6 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB7 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB8 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB9 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXILIARVERB10 .o. RELATIVECLAUSEMARKRULE1 .o. NOMINALRELATIVECLAUSERULE1;

read regex AUXVERB11;

read regex AUXVERB12;

#read regex VERBCAT .o. FUTUREMARK .o. FUTURERULE1;

#--------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> rules for nouns
